Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
604

DISTRICT
COURTS

Section

604-1 Judicial circuits; district judges;
sessions

604-2 Appointment and tenure of district judges;

per diem district judges

604-2.5 Salary of district judges

604-3 Disqualification, absence, vacancy

604-4 Repealed

604-5 Civil jurisdiction

604-6 Ejectment proceedings

604-6.1 Jurisdiction of district courts; leased or

rented personal property

604-6.2 Order to show cause

604-7 Powers; venue

604-7.2 Arrest warrants arising from traffic
violations

604-7.3 Change of venue

604-7.4 Cure or waiver of defects

604-7.5 Continuance of hearing or trial

604-8 Criminal, misdemeanors, generally

604-9 Same; powers

604-10 Repealed

604-10.5 Power to enjoin and temporarily restrain

harassment

604-11 Jurisdiction of district courts;
ordinances

604-11.5 Same; offenses committed within the
circuit

604-12 Repealed

604-13 Arrest under warrant

604-14 Repealed

604-15 Rules by supreme court

604-16 Expenses of serving warrant

604-17 Courts of record; testimony and
proceedings

604-18, 19 Repealed

604-20 Powers of clerk

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

District court judges as hearing officers for administrative
revocation of drivers licenses proceedings. L 1990, c 188, §13.

Cross References

Small claims, etc., see chapter 633.

Rules of Court

See generally Rules of the District Courts; District Court
Rules of Civil Procedure; Hawaii Rules of Penal Procedure; Hawaii Court Records
Rules; Hawaii Electronic Filing and Service Rules.

Law Journals and Reviews

Electronic Discovery: A Call for a New Rules Regime for the
Hawai‘i Courts. 32 UH L. Rev. 153 (2009).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next